North Dakota statutes. TITLE 37 Military
CHAPTER 37-01 General Provisions
37-01-39.1.
Unit funds — Maintenance and expenditure.

Each unit of the North Dakota national guard, upon approval of the adjutant general, is authorized to maintain a nonreverting unit fund for purposes as prescribed by federal law and regulations relating to unit funds of the federal military forces and to pay petty operating, equipment, and supply costs incurred by the individual units. All funds transferred by the adjutant general to the unit fund must be deposited in the unit fund and are hereby appropriated for the maintenance and operation of the unit funds. Unit funds may be expended upon authorization of the unit fund custodian designated by the adjutant general under guidelines established by the adjutant general.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 311, § 1.

37-01-40.
Veteran and wartime veteran defined — Uniform service dates for wartime veterans.

A “veteran” is an individual who has served on continuous federalized active military duty for one hundred eighty days or the full period for which the individual was called or ordered to active military duty for reasons other than training, and who was discharged or released under other than dishonorable conditions. A discharge reflecting “expiration of term of service” or “completion of required service” or words to that effect qualifies the shorter term of service as making the individual a veteran.

A “wartime veteran” is an individual who served in the active military forces, during a period of armed conflict or who received the armed forces expeditionary or other campaign service medal during an emergency condition and who was discharged or released under other than dishonorable conditions. “Wartime veteran” also includes an individual who died in the line of duty in the active military forces, as determined by the armed forces.

Period of service dates for a wartime veteran begins with the date of any declaration of war by the Congress of the United States or presidential proclamation beginning hostilities or the beginning of an emergency condition recognized by the issuance of a presidential proclamation or a presidential executive order and in which the armed forces expeditionary medal or other campaign service medals are awarded according to presidential executive order and ending on a date prescribed by presidential proclamation or concurrent resolution of the Congress of the United States and dates determined by the United States department of defense.

Current uniform period of service dates for periods of armed conflict include:

The period beginning December 7, 1941, through December 31, 1946, known as world war II;

The period beginning June 27, 1950, through January 31, 1955, known as the Korean war;

The period beginning August 5, 1964, through May 7, 1975, known as the Vietnam war;

The period beginning August 2, 1990, through January 2, 1992, known as the gulf war; and

The period beginning September 11, 2001, and ending on a date prescribed by presidential proclamation or by Congress as the last day of operation Iraqi freedom or operation enduring freedom, whichever occurs later.

The department of veterans’ affairs shall maintain a list of all period of service dates for emergency conditions in which the armed forces expeditionary medal has been awarded.

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 323, § 1; 1975, ch. 309, § 1; 1979, ch. 215, § 3; 1981, ch. 91, § 23; 1983, ch. 172, § 42; 1985, ch. 397, § 4; 2001, ch. 320, § 1; 2007, ch. 305, § 1.

37-01-41.
Claims against the national guard.

Any individual injured by an activity of the North Dakota national guard may submit a claim to the adjutant general. As used in this section, “claim” means a monetary demand upon the state for personal injury or property damage arising from activities of the national guard while on state active duty.

The adjutant general may approve a claim for less than two thousand five hundred dollars. If the claim is approved by the adjutant general, the adjutant general shall apply to the emergency commission for an amount from the contingency fund sufficient to pay the claim. It must be conclusively presumed upon the receipt of such application by the emergency commission that an emergency exists, and the commission shall direct the transfer of the requested amount to the adjutant general from the contingency fund. The adjutant general, upon receipt of the transfer from the contingency fund, shall pay the claim.

The adjutant general shall forward any claim exceeding two thousand five hundred dollars to the emergency commission with the adjutant general’s recommendation. If the claim is approved by the emergency commission, it must be conclusively presumed that an emergency exists, and the commission shall direct the transfer of the approved amount to the adjutant general from the contingency fund. The adjutant general, upon receipt of the transfer from the contingency fund, shall pay the claim.

Decisions of the adjutant general or the emergency commission partially or totally denying a claim may not be appealed to any court of this state.

Claims may not be submitted to the legislative assembly unless the claim has been partially or totally denied by the adjutant general or the emergency commission.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 389, § 1.

Collateral References.

Official immunity of state national guard members, 52 A.L.R.4th 1095.

37-01-42.
Honorary high school diplomas — Veterans of World War II and Korean and Vietnam conflicts.

Any World War II veteran who did not receive a high school diploma may apply for an honorary high school diploma, provided:

The veteran entered the United States armed forces between September 16, 1940, and December 31, 1946, prior to completing the necessary high school graduation requirements; and

The veteran was honorably discharged from the United States armed forces.

Any Korean conflict veteran who did not receive a high school diploma may apply for an honorary high school diploma, provided:

The veteran was a member of the United States armed forces between June 27, 1950, and January 31, 1955; and

The veteran was honorably discharged from the United States armed forces.

Any Vietnam conflict veteran who did not receive a high school diploma may apply for an honorary high school diploma, provided:

The veteran entered the United States armed forces between February 28, 1961, and May 7, 1975; and

The veteran was honorably discharged from the United States armed forces.

In order to receive an honorary high school diploma, the veteran or a representative of the veteran shall complete an application on a form prescribed by the superintendent of public instruction. A county veterans’ service officer shall certify the veteran’s status as an honorably discharged veteran who served during the qualifying period to the superintendent of public instruction. The superintendent of public instruction shall forward the application to the school district in which the veteran last attended school before induction. If the school district no longer exists, the application must be forwarded to the school district that has jurisdiction. If a school district decides not to issue a diploma under this program, the veteran may apply to the superintendent of public instruction for the diploma.

The school district and the superintendent of public instruction shall review and either approve or deny each application received.

If a veteran who would have qualified for a diploma under this section is deceased, a family member of the veteran may apply for and, if approved, be awarded the veteran’s honorary high school diploma.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 321, § 1; 2003, ch. 295, § 1; 2011, ch. 254, § 1.

37-01-43.
North Dakota military civil relief act.

An individual called or ordered to active service for thirty consecutive days or longer has all of the protections afforded to persons in the military service of the United States under the Servicemembers Civil Relief Act [50 U.S.C. 3901-4043] in effect on December 31, 2020.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 296, § 1; 2011, ch. 253, § 3; 2013, ch. 263, § 2; 2015, ch. 248, § 1, effective March 12, 2015; 2017, ch. 240, § 2, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 286, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 268, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 248, S.L. 2015 became effective March 12, 2015, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 6 of chapter 248, S.L. 2015.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 263, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

37-01-44.
Reimbursement of certain medical expenses for North Dakota national guard members while on state active duty.

The North Dakota national guard is authorized to pay medical expenses for national guard members who are called to state active duty when the member sustains an injury or illness that is found to have occurred within the line of duty and is not covered by workforce safety and insurance and when such treatment occurred while on state active duty. Payments shall be made only for costs not covered by other health insurance. Coverage of qualifying medical expenses is subject to rules set forth by the office of the adjutant general and subject to available funds.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 255, § 1.

37-01-45.
Record of veterans.

The adjutant general shall initiate and coordinate the collecting of information on North Dakotans who served in a theatre or area of armed conflict since the Vietnam conflict. The adjutant general shall make the information available to the public in a manner that the adjutant general deems advisable.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 264, § 1; 2015, ch. 249, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 249, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

This section became effective August 1, 2013.

37-01-46.
Honoring as veterans individuals who have performed military service.

An individual who has performed service in the national guard, the armed forces reserve of the United States, or active duty armed forces of the United States, has received an honorable discharge from service, and is not otherwise included within the definition of a veteran under federal or state law is, at the completion of that individual’s term of service, honored as a veteran, but is not entitled to any benefits or preferences available to veterans by reason of this section.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 250, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2015.

37-01-47.
Health insurance coverage while on state active duty.

During the period of active duty, the national guard may pay any primary health insurance premium on behalf of a national guard service member or an employer-sponsored health insurance premium cost share paid by the service member while called to state active duty. Coverage of qualifying premium payment is subject to rules set forth by the adjutant general’s office and subject to available funds.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 242, § 1, effective April 5, 2017.

Note.

Section 4 of chapter 242, S.L. 2017 provides, “

RETROACTIVE APPLICATION.

Section 1 of this Act applies retroactively to eligible expenses incurred by national guard service members called to state active duty in response to protest activities since August 19, 2016."

37-01-48
Payment of death benefits.

The national guard may pay a death benefit to a designated beneficiary, or to the next of kin, of a national guard service member who died while serving in a state active duty status under this chapter. The payment of a death benefit may not exceed fifteen thousand dollars and is subject to available funds. The adjutant general may adopt rules to implement this section.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 269, § 1, effective April 20, 2021.